Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-276
Hearing; evidence on student's conduct and records.

At a hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269, the principal shall present to the hearing examiner statements, in affidavit form, of any person having information about the student's conduct and the student's records but not unless such statements and records have been provided to the student or the student's parent, guardian, or representative at least forty-eight hours prior to the hearing. The information contained in such records shall be explained and interpreted, prior to or at the hearing, to the student, parent, guardian, or representative, upon request, by appropriate school personnel.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 20;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 26;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,189;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 80;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 70.